Hawaii statutes.
§476-14 Acceleration of time payments.
No provision in a credit sale contract by which, in the absence of the buyer's
default, the holder may, arbitrarily and without reasonable cause, accelerate
the maturity of any part or all of the payments shall be enforceable. [L 1961,
c 102, pt of §1; Supp, §201A-11; HRS §476-12; am and ren L 1984, c 86, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next